nb: Baby og barn > Babysikkerhet > Babycaller: Babycaller med lyd og video; Babycaller med lyd; Babycaller med video
da: Baby og småbørn > Baby – sikkerhedsudstyr > Babyalarmer: Babyalarmer med lyd og video; Babyalarmer med lyd; Babyalarmer med video
nl: Baby en peuter > Babyveiligheid > Babyfoons: Audio- en videobabyfoons; Audiobabyfoons; Videobabyfoons
pt-BR: Infantil > Segurança de bebês > Monitores de bebês: Monitores de áudio e vídeo para bebês; Monitores de áudio para bebês; Monitores de vídeo para bebês
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Sigurnost bebe > Monitori za bebe: Audio i video monitori za bebe; Audio monitori za bebe; Video monitori za bebe
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Kūdikių sauga > Kūdikių monitoriai: Garso ir vaizdo kūdikių monitoriai; Garso kūdikių monitoriai; Vaizdo kūdikių monitoriai
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Güvenliği > Bebek İzleme Cihazları: Sesli ve Görüntülü Bebek Telsizleri; Sesli Bebek İzleme Cihazları; Videolu Bebek İzleme Cihazları
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Bababiztonság > Babafigyelők: Audio és videó babafigyelők; Audio babafigyelők; Videó babafigyelők
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 嬰兒安全 > 嬰兒監視器: 嬰兒聲音和視訊監控器; 嬰兒聲音監控器; 嬰兒視訊監控器
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Безопасност на бебето > Бебефони: Аудио- и видеобебефони; Аудиобебефони; Видеобебефони
it: Bebè e bimbi > Sicurezza dei bebè > Interfoni per interni: Baby monitor audio e video; Baby monitor audio; Baby monitor video
ko: 영유아 > 영유아 안전용품 > 베이비 모니터: 오디오/비디오용 베이비 모니터; 오디오용 베이비 모니터; 비디오용 베이비 모니터
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Segurança do bebé > Monitores de bebé: Monitores de bebé com áudio e vídeo; Monitores de bebé com áudio; Monitores de bebé com vídeo
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Protección para el bebé > Interfonos para bebés: Monitores de audio y vídeo para bebés; Monitores de audio para bebés; Monitores de vídeo para bebés
ja: ベビー用品 > ベビー用安全グッズ > ベビーモニター: オーディオ・ビデオベビーモニター; オーディオベビーモニター; ビデオベビーモニター
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Babysicherheit > Babyfone: Audio- und Video-Babyfone; Babyfone; Video-Babyfone
ru: Товары для детей > Безопасность детей > Электронные няни: Радионяни и видеоняни; Радионяни; Видеоняни
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Bezpieczeństwo niemowląt > Nianie elektroniczne: Nianie elektroniczne audio i wideo; Nianie elektroniczne audio; Nianie elektroniczne wideo
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 婴儿安全用品 > 婴儿监护器: 音频与视频婴儿监护器; 音频婴儿监护器; 视频婴儿监护器
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Βρεφική ασφάλεια > Μόνιτορ μωρού: Μόνιτορ μωρού με ήχο & εικόνα; Μόνιτορ μωρού με ήχο; Μόνιτορ μωρού με βίντεο
sv: Baby och småbarn > Babysäkerhet > Babyvakter: Babyvakter audio och video; Babyvakter audio; Babyvakter video
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Varnost dojenčka > Otroški monitorji: Avdio in video otroški monitorji; Avdio otroški monitorji; Video otroški monitorji
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Siguranța bebelușului > Monitoare pentru bebeluși: Monitoare audio și video pentru bebeluși; Monitoare audio pentru bebeluși; Monitoare video pentru bebeluși
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vauvan turvallisuus > Itkuhälyttimet: Ääni- ja videopohjaiset itkuhälyttimet; Äänipohjaiset itkuhälyttimet; Videopohjaiset itkuhälyttimet
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Accessoires de sécurité pour bébés > Écoute-bébés: Écoute-bébés audio et vidéo; Écoute-bébés audio; Écoute-bébés vidéo
cs: Děti a kojenci > Potřeby pro bezpečnost dětí > Dětské monitory: Audio a video chůvičky; Audio chůvičky; Video chůvičky
sk-SK: Bábätká > Bezpečnosť detí > Detské pestúnky: Detské audio a video pestúnky; Detské audio pestúnky; Detské video pestúnky
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > An toàn cho bé > Thiết bị theo dõi trẻ sơ sinh: Thiết bị theo dõi trẻ sơ sinh bằng âm thanh & video; Thiết bị theo dõi trẻ sơ sinh bằng âm thanh; Thiết bị theo dõi trẻ sơ sinh bằng video
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > อุปกรณ์ความปลอดภัยสำหรับทารก > เครื่องตรวจสอบทารก: เครื่องตรวจสอบทารกแบบเสียงและวิดีโอ; เครื่องตรวจสอบทารกแบบเสียง; เครื่องตรวจสอบทารกแบบวิดีโอ
en: Baby & Toddler > Baby Safety > Baby Monitors: Audio & Video Baby Monitors; Audio Baby Monitors; Video Baby Monitors